src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! NB: through June 2019, J. Wilbur's development work made possible by Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft (grant 286335341)

! ############################## !
!! # Pite Saami numerals 
! ############################## !

! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral					   !!= * **@CODE@**
CARDbasic ;
CARDsuppletive ;
CARD10s ;


LEXICON CARDbasic
akkta: NUM1 "ett, one" ;
guäkkte: NUM2 "två, two" ;
gålbmå:gålbm NUMå "tre, three" ;
nällje:niellj NUMe "fyra, four";
nällje+Use/NG:nieldj NUMe "fyra, four";
vihta:viht NUMa "fem, five" ;
guhta:guht NUMa "sex, six" ;
gietjav:giehtj NUM7 "sju, seven" ;
gietjav+Use/NG:tjiehtj NUM7 "sju, seven" ;
gákktse:gákkts NUMe "åtta, eight" ;
åkktse:åkkts NUMe "nio, nine" ;


LEXICON CARDsuppletive
nålla:nålºla NUM0 "noll, zero" ;
vuostas:vuostas ORDsuppl1 "först, first" ;
mubbe:mubbe ORDsuppl2 "andra, second/other" ;
mubbe+Use/NG:nubbe ORDsuppl2 "andra, second/other" ;
mubbe+Use/NG+A+Ord+Sg+Acc:nubbe%>v K "på den andra, on the second/other" ; !needs to be added later for other Nums, but definitely works for nubbe (cf. pit100405b.052)
mubbe+Use/NG+A+Ord+Sg+Ine:nubbe%>n K "på den andra, on the second/other" ; !needs to be added later for other Nums, but definitely works for nubbe (cf. sje19521200a.044)
mubbe+A+Ord+Pl+Gen:mubbe%>j K "the others'" ; !needs to be added later for other Nums, but definitely works for nubbe (cf. sje19210000a-lagercrantz1957a-426.061)
lågev:låg2 NUM10 "tio, ten" ;
tjuohte:tjuoht NUM100 "hundra, hundred"; !verify ORD form!
tuvsán:tuvsán NUM1000 "tusen, thousand" ; !verify ORD form!


LEXICON NUM0 ! num 0
+Num: ENDLEX ; 

LEXICON NUM1 ! num 1
+Num:akkta NumCase ; !needs to be added later for other Nums, but definitely works for akkta
:#akkt ORD ; !only for 2+digit NUMs
!:akkta 10s ;

LEXICON NUM2 ! num 2
+Num:gu^Okkte ENDLEX ; 
+Num+Pl+Nom:gu^Okkte^WG ENDLEX ; ! cf. sje19521200a.027 !this needs to be generalized for other case/num later
:#gu^Okkt ORD ; !only for 2+digit NUMs
!:gu^Okkte 10s ;

LEXICON NUMa ! a-stem num (5,6)
+Num:a ENDLEX ; 
+Num+Pl+Nom:a^WG ENDLEX ; !connect to noninal inflection lexicon?
ORD ;

LEXICON NUMå ! å-stem num (3)
+Num:å ENDLEX ; 
+Num+Pl+Nom:å^WG ENDLEX ; !connect to noninal inflection lexicon? 
ORD ;
!:å 10s ;

LEXICON NUMe ! e-stem num (4,8,9)
+Num:e ENDLEX ; 
+Num+Pl+Nom:e^WG ENDLEX ; !connect to noninal inflection lexicon?
ORD ;
!:e 10s ;

LEXICON NUM7 ! num (7)
+Num:av^WG ENDLEX ; 
+Num+Pl+Nom:av N_ODD_X ; 
ORD7 ;
!:av 10s ; !verify this

LEXICON NUM10 ! num (10)
+Num+Sg+Gen:e ENDLEX ; !special case for gen.sg for numeral 10! without final -v! (cf. låge nanne)
+Num:ev^WG ENDLEX ; 
+Num: ENDLEX ; !in compound numbers
ORD10 ;

LEXICON NUM100 ! num (100); treat as noun and NUM
+Num:e EVENCASE ;  ! Sg Nom, Ess
+Num:e N_EVEN_ILL ;
+Num:e^WG N_EVEN_WK ; ! (but this leads to a DIM possibility, too - for tjuohte? tjuodátj?)
ORD ;
!:e N_EVEN ;
!NUMe ;

LEXICON NUM1000 ! num (1000); treat as noun and NUM
+Num+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+Num: N_ODD_X ;
ORD10 ;
!N_ODD ;
!+Num: ENDLEX ; 

LEXICON NumCase ! case forms for Numerals
: ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Acc:^WG%>v ENDLEX ; !needs to be generalized later, but definitely works for akkta
+Sg+Gen:^WG%> ENDLEX ; !needs to be generalized later, but definitely works for akkta


!ORDINAL forms (add cases later)
LEXICON ORD
+A+Attr+Ord:át^WG ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Nom:át^WG ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ORD7
+A+Attr+Ord:et ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Nom:et ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ORD10
+A+Attr+Ord:át ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Nom:át ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ORDsuppl1 !suppletive ordinal forms for vuostas
+A+Attr+Ord: ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ORDsuppl2 !suppletive ordinal forms for mubbe
+A+Attr+Ord: ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ;
+A+Ord+Sg+Ill:%>j^V2E2AA ENDLEX ;



LEXICON CARD10s !2-digit NUMs
akkta#lågev:akkta#låg2 ROUND10s ; !but does akktalågev really exist??
akkta#lågev+Num:akkta#låg2 ENDLEX ; !but does akktalågev really exist??
akkta#lågev#:akkta#låk# CARDbasic ;
guäkkte#lågev:guäkkte#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
guäkkte#lågev+Num:guäkkte#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
guäkkte#lågev#:guäkkte#låk# CARDbasic ;
gålbmå#lågev:gålbmå#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
gålbmå#lågev+Num:gålbmå#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
gålbmå#lågev#:gålbmå#låk# CARDbasic ;
nällje#lågev:nällje#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
nällje#lågev+Num:nällje#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
nällje#lågev#:nällje#låk# CARDbasic ;
vihta#lågev:vihta#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
vihta#lågev+Num:vihta#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
vihta#lågev#:vihta#låk# CARDbasic ;
guhta#lågev:guhta#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
guhta#lågev+Num:guhta#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
guhta#lågev#:guhta#låk# CARDbasic ;
gietjav#lågev:gietjav#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
gietjav#lågev+Num:gietjav#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
gietjav#lågev#:gietjav#låk# CARDbasic ;
gákktse#lågev:gákktse#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
gákktse#lågev+Num:gákktse#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
gákktse#lågev#:gákktse#låk# CARDbasic ;
åkktse#lågev:åkktse#låg2 ROUND10s ; 
åkktse#lågev+Num:åkktse#låg2 ENDLEX ; 
åkktse#lågev#:åkktse#låk# CARDbasic ;
